Maryland, session 2025, HB0212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
12–503.
(a) (1) The Department shall adopt by regulation, as the Maryland Building
Performance Standards, the International Building Code, including the International
Energy Conservation Code, with the modifications incorporated by the Department under
subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The Department shall adopt each subsequent version of the Standards
within 18 months after it is issued.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0212*

HOUSE BILL 212
(b) (1) Before adopting each version of the Standards, the Department shall:
(i) review the International Building Code to determine whether
modifications should be incorporated in the Standards;
(ii) consider changes to the International Building Code to enhance
energy conservation and efficiency;
(iii) subject to the provisions of paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection,
adopt modifications to the Standards that allow any innovative approach, design,
equipment, or method of construction that can be demonstrated to offer performance that
is at least the equivalent to the requirements of:
1. the International Energy Conservation Code;
2. Chapter 13, “Energy Efficiency”, of the International
Building Code; or
3. Chapter 11, “Energy Efficiency”, of the International
Residential Code;
(iv) accept written comments;
(v) consider any comments received; and
(vi) hold a public hearing on each proposed modification.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, and § 12–510 of this subtitle, the Department
may not adopt, as part of the Standards, a modification of a building code requirement that
is more stringent than the requirement in the International Building Code.
(ii) The Department may adopt energy conservation requirements
that are more stringent than the requirements in the International Energy Conservation
Code, but may not adopt energy conservation requirements that are less stringent than the
requirements in the International Energy Conservation Code.
(3) (I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ADOPT, AS PART OF THE STANDARDS:
1. SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A REQUIREMENT THAT NEW BUILDINGS MEET ALL ENERGY DEMANDS
OF THE BUILDING WITHOUT THE USE OF FOSSIL FUELS; AND
2. AN ELECTRIC–READY STANDARD FOR NEW BUILDINGS
THAT RECEIVE A WAIVER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.

HOUSE BILL 212 3
(II) THE REQUIREMENT THAT NEW BUILDINGS MEET ALL
ENERGY DEMANDS WITHOUT THE USE OF FOSSIL FUELS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE MET:
1. ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, FOR A BUILDING:
A. THAT WILL BE LESS THAN SEVEN STORIES TALL; AND
B. FOR WHICH A BUILDING PERMIT APPLICATION IS
RECEIVED BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION; AND
2. ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2031, FOR A BUILDING:
A. THAT WILL BE SEVEN OR MORE STORIES TALL; AND
B. FOR WHICH A BUILDING PERMIT APPLICATION IS
RECEIVED BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION.
(III) 1. SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPHS 2 AND 3 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY GRANT A WAIVER FROM THE
REQUIREMENT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR:
A. EMERGENCY BACK–UP POWER SYSTEMS FOR NEW
BUILDINGS; AND
B. NEW BUILDINGS SPECIFICALLY DESIGNATED FOR
OCCUPANCY BY A COMMERCIAL FOOD ESTABLISHMENT, LABORATORY,
LAUNDROMAT, HOSPITAL, OR CREMATORIUM.
2. A. A WAIVER GRANTED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL BE LIMITED TO BUILDING
SYSTEMS AND AREAS THAT CANNOT FEASIBLY USE ENERGY GENERATED FROM A
SOURCE OTHER THAN FOSSIL FUELS.
B. FINANCIAL CONSIDERATIONS ARE NOT A SUFFICIENT
BASIS FOR DETERMINING FEASIBILITY UNDER SUBSUBSUBPARAGRAPH A OF THIS
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH.
3. A BUILDING THAT IS GRANTED A WAIVER UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL:
A. SEEK TO MINIMIZE EMISSIONS FROM ITS FOSSIL FUEL
USE;

HOUSE BILL 212
B. MAXIMIZE HEALTH, SAFETY, AND FIRE PROTECTION;
AND
C. BE REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH THE
ELECTRIC–READY STANDARDS ADOPTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)2 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
4. TO ENSURE A WAIVER GRANTED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH IS STILL NECESSARY, THE WAIVER
SHALL BE REVIEWED:
A. EACH TIME THE STANDARDS ARE MODIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
B. BY THE LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT GRANTED THE
WAIVER EACH TIME THE LOCAL JURISDICTION MODIFIES ITS LOCAL AMENDMENTS
UNDER § 12–504 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(IV) NOTHING IN THIS PARAGRAPH MAY BE CONSTRUED TO
PROHIBIT A LOCAL JURISDICTION FROM PROHIBITING THE USE OF FOSSIL FUELS IN
BUILDINGS.
(c) The Standards apply to each building or structure in the State for which a
building permit application is received by a local jurisdiction on or after August 1, 1995.
(d) In addition to the Standards, the Department shall:
(1) on or before January 1, 2023, adopt by regulation the 2018
International Green Construction Code; and
(2) adopt each subsequent version of the Code within 18 months after it is
issued.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2026, the Maryland Department of Labor, in conjunction with the Maryland Energy
Administration, the Public Service Commission, and the Department of Housing and
Community Development, shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on any policy changes needed
to ensure the provisions under § 12–503(b)(3) of the Public Safety Article, as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act, do not diminish the availability of affordable housing or the
affordability of electricity for customers in all–electric buildings, including changes to:
(1) electricity rates and tariff structures;
(2) laws;

HOUSE BILL 212 5
(3) policies;
(4) regulations; and
(5) subsidy programs.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.